Hawaii statutes.
§466-38 Reporting to the board. (a)
A firm shall submit to the board:

(1) A copy of the peer review report and the final
letter of acceptance from the sponsoring organization, if the report has a
rating of "pass";

(2) A copy of the peer review report, the firm's
letter of response, the corrective action letter, and the final letter of
acceptance if the report has a rating of "pass with deficiency" or
"fail"; or

(3) A copy of any report or Part I and any other
public portion of the report resulting from any inspection by the public
company accounting oversight board firm inspection program together with
documentation of any significant deficiencies, findings, and the firm's
response.

(b) For peer reviews scheduled after December
31, 2014, any report or document required to be submitted under subsection (a)
shall be filed with the board as follows:

(1) Firms enrolled in the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants and Hawaii Society of Certified Public Accountants
peer review programs and administered by the Hawaii Society of Certified Public
Accountants, within thirty calendar days of receipt of the notice of completion
from the Hawaii Society of Certified Public Accountants, shall complete the
peer review compliance reporting form under section 466-35 and submit the form
to the board along with the required documents;

(2) Firms otherwise enrolled in the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants peer review program, including those
whose peer reviews are administered by the National Peer Review Committee,
within thirty calendar days of receipt of the notice of completion from the
sponsoring organization, shall complete the peer review compliance reporting
form under section 466-35 and submit the form to the board along with the required
documents;

(3) Firms enrolled in the public company accounting
oversight board inspection program shall, within thirty calendar days of
receipt of the issuance of the Part I report from the public company accounting
oversight board, complete the peer review compliance reporting form required by
section 466-35 and submit the form to the board along with the required
documents; and

(4) Firms enrolled in any other peer review program
approved by this part shall submit the report generated by that review process
and all associated documentation to the board in a form acceptable to the
board.

(c) Any report or document submitted to the
board under this section, including the board's peer review compliance
reporting form, shall be confidential. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1; am L 2016, c
145, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next